Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6374.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1203. As used in this act: (a) "Savings bank" means a savings bank that is organized under the savings bank act, 1996 PA 354, MCL 487.3101 to 487.3804, or the laws of another state, the District of Columbia, a territory or protectorate of the United States, or of the United States, whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. (b) "Service entity" means a corporation, mutual company, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership in which a bank has invested under section 4310(1). With the written approval of the director, a service entity may be a general partnership. (c) "Service provider" means a person that provides any of the following to an institution: (i) Data processing services. (ii) Activities that support financial services, including, but not limited to, lending, funds transfer, fiduciary activities, trading activities, and deposit taking. (iii) Internet-related services, including, but not limited to, web services and electronic bill payments, mobile applications, system and software development and maintenance, and security monitoring. (iv) Activities related to the business of banking. (d) "Shareholder" means the registered owner of any share or shares of capital stock of an institution. (e) "State agency" means a foreign bank agency that is established and operating under this act. (f) "State foreign bank branch" means a foreign bank branch that is established and operating under this act. (g) "Stock association" means an association that has authority to issue shares of voting capital stock. (h) "Subsidiary" means a corporation, mutual company, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership, the controlling interests of which are more than 50% owned by 1 or more depository institutions, and in which a bank has an ownership interest, membership interest, or other legally enforceable interest that is the indicia of ownership. With the approval of the director, and subject to the ownership requirements set forth in this subdivision, a subsidiary may be a general partnership. (i) "Surplus" means the amount paid for issued and outstanding common and preferred stock of a bank in excess of the stated par value, plus any amount of transferred undivided profits and any additional amounts paid in or contributed to increase total capital. (j) "Total capital" means an amount equal to any capital, plus any surplus, undivided profits, and instruments of indebtedness authorized under section 3801. (k) "Trust office" means an office of a bank at which trust services are performed and at which deposits are not accepted, checks are not paid, and money is not lent. (l) "Uniform commercial code" means the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.9994. (l) (m) "Venture capital" means equity financing that is provided for starting up or expanding a company, or related purposes, such as including, but not limited to, financing for seed capital, research and development, introduction of a product or process into the marketplace, or similar needs requiring risk capital. A venture capital investment shall must not include the purchase of a share of stock in a company if, on the date on which the share of stock is purchased, the company has securities outstanding that are registered on a national securities exchange under section 12(b) of title I of the securities exchange act of 1934, 15 USC 78l, ; that are registered or required to be registered under section 12(g) of title I of the securities exchange act of 1934, 15 USC 78l, or which would be required to be registered except for the exemptions in section 12(g)(2) of title I of the securities exchange act of 1934, 15 USC 78l. (m) (n) "Violation", as used in sections 2304, 2305, and 2306, includes, without limitation but is not limited to, any action, alone or with others, for or toward causing, bringing about, participating in, counseling, or aiding or abetting a violation. Sec. 3714. Notwithstanding section 1105 of the uniform commercial code, both Both of the following apply: (a) A bank which that has 1 or more branch offices in a foreign country shall be is liable for contracts to be performed and for deposits to be repaid at any branch office in that foreign country to no greater extent than a bank, banking corporation, or other organization or association for banking purposes organized and existing under the laws of the foreign country would be liable under its laws. The laws of the foreign country for the purpose of this section are considered to include all acts, decrees, regulations, and orders promulgated or enforced by a dominant authority asserting governmental, military, or police power of any kind at the place where the branch office is located, whether or not the dominant authority is recognized as a de facto or de jure government. (b) If by action of a dominant authority that is not recognized by the United States as the de jure government of the foreign territory concerned, any property situated in or any amount to be received in the foreign territory and carried as an asset of a branch office of the bank in the foreign territory is seized, destroyed, or canceled, the liability of the bank for any deposit received and to be repaid by it, and for any contract made and to be performed by it, at any branch office in the foreign territory shall must be reduced pro tanto by the proportion that the value, as shown by the books or other records of the bank at the time of the seizure, destruction, or cancellation of the assets bears to the aggregate of all the deposit and contract liabilities of the branch offices of the bank in the foreign territory, as shown at the time by the books or other records of the bank. Sec. 3808. (1) If, 30 days after notice as provided in section 3807, a shareholder has refused or neglected to pay an assessment levied on the shares held by the shareholder, the directors may sell any or all of the shareholder's shares to satisfy the assessment. The proceeds of the sale shall must be distributed in the following order: (a) The reasonable expenses of holding for sale and selling the stock in a manner not prohibited by law, including reasonable attorney fees and legal expenses incurred by the bank. (b) The satisfaction of the assessment levied by the directors. (c) The satisfaction of an indebtedness secured by any security interest in the stock if written notification demanding proceeds is received by the bank before distribution of the proceeds is completed. Unless the holder of a security interest provides reasonable proof of the interest, the bank does not have to comply with this subdivision. (d) Any remaining surplus shall must be distributed to the shareholder. (2) Disposition of the stock may be at a public or private sale at any time and on any terms, but every aspect of the disposition including the method, manner, time, place, and terms shall must be commercially reasonable and reasonably calculated to meet the deficiency. (3) A sale of stock as provided in this section shall effect constitutes an absolute cancellation of any outstanding certificates evidencing the stock sold and any security interest granted or pledge made in stock issued after the effective date of this act. March 1, 2000. Upon On full payment of the stock sold, the bank shall issue new certificates to the purchaser. (4) The purchaser takes the stock free of any rights or interests the shareholder may have based on an unintentional failure by the bank to comply with this section or section 3807 if all of the following apply: (a) The purchaser has no knowledge of any defect in the proceedings. (b) The purchaser does not act in collusion with any shareholders of the bank, a secured party, other bidders, or the bank. (c) The purchaser makes the purchase in good faith. (5) The ability of a bank to make an assessment under section 3807 or to sell the stock of a shareholder under this section is not limited by the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.12501. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6347 (request no. H02809'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.